src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-h13_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    setur+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: setur
    setur+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: setur
    setur+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: setri
    setur+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: seturs
    setur+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: setur
    setur+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: setur
    setur+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: setrum
    setur+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: setra
    setur+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: setrið
    setur+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: setrið
    setur+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: setrinum
    setur+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: setursins
    setur+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: setrini
    setur+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: setrini
    setur+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: setrunum
    setur+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: setranna
